Washington statutes.
RCW 43.71.100

Access to information about exclusion of mandated benefits from qualified health plans—Exchange's duties.

(1) Beginning November 1, 2021, the exchange shall provide individuals seeking to enroll in coverage on its website with access to the information a health carrier must provide under RCW 48.43.725 for any qualified health plan the health carrier offers that excludes, under state or federal law, any benefit required or mandated by Title 48 RCW or rules adopted by the commissioner.

(2) The exchange may provide the access required under this section directly on its website, through a link to an external website, or in any other manner that allows consumers to easily access the information.

[ 2020 c 283 s 2.]